test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-paivukko_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - paivukko - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'borg' - ei tsekattu
     paivukko+N+Sg+Nom: paivukko
     paivukko+N+Sg+Gen: paivukon
     paivukko+N+Sg+Par: paivukkoo
     paivukko+N+Sg+Tra: paivukoksi
     paivukko+N+Sg+Abe: paivukotta
     paivukko+N+Sg+Ine: paivukossa
     paivukko+N+Sg+Ela: paivukosta
     paivukko+N+Sg+Ill: paivukkhoon
     paivukko+N+Sg+Ade: paivukolla
     paivukko+N+Sg+Abl: paivukolta
     paivukko+N+Sg+All: paivukolle
     paivukko+N+Sg+Ess: paivukkonna
     paivukko+N+Pl+Nom: paivukot
     paivukko+N+Pl+Gen: paivukoitten
     paivukko+N+Pl+Par: paivukoita
     paivukko+N+Pl+Tra: paivukoiksi
     paivukko+N+Pl+Abe: paivukoitta
     paivukko+N+Pl+Ine: paivukoissa
     paivukko+N+Pl+Ela: paivukoista
     paivukko+N+Pl+Ill: paivukkhoin
     paivukko+N+Pl+Ade: paivukoilla
     paivukko+N+Pl+Abl: paivukoilta
     paivukko+N+Pl+All: paivukoille
     paivukko+N+Pl+Ess: paivukkoinna
     paivukko+N+Pl+Com: paivukkoine
